Massachusetts, session 194th, S1541.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (b) of section 8A of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended in paragraph (7) by inserting after the
word “coaches,” the following word:- athletic.
SECTION 2. Subsection (c) of said section 8A of said chapter 69, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “coaches,” the following word:- athletic.
SECTION 3. Section 54A of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the words “eleven C“, in line 3, the following words:- or a licensed
athletic trainer, who have completed an annual head injury safety training as required pursuant to
105 CMR 201.007.
of 2

SECTION 4. Section 23A of chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking out in the definition of “Athletic trainer”, as so appearing, the words “and who limits his
practice to schools, teams or organizations with whom he is associated”.
SECTION 5. The board of allied health professions shall review and update any
applicable rules and regulations in accordance with this act not later than 180 following
enactment.
of 2